California statutes. Education Code
(1) (A) If the governing board of a community college district receives a written petition of qualified electors not less in number than 10 percent of the number voting in the last election for a member of the governing board of the community college district calling for the termination of the merit (civil service) system and the system has been in operation for not less than five years, the governing board of the community college district shall order the county superintendent of schools to place the question of termination of the system on the ballot at the next regular governing
 board member election, or the next primary or general election in a general election year, whichever is the earlier after receipt by the county superintendent of schools.

(B) The statement of purpose of the election shall read:

“Shall the merit (civil service) system for school employees not employed as faculty or educational administrators, as provided for in Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of Chapter 4 of Part 51 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code of the State of California, and which has been in operation for at least five years, be terminated by the _____ Community College District of ____ County (or counties, where appropriate) on _____ (date to be specified by board)?”

(C) The petition calling for the election, to be valid, shall contain the statement of purpose for the election as contained in this
 section.

(2) (A) If the governing board of a community college district receives a written petition from 40 percent of the classified employees entitled to vote calling for the termination of the merit (civil service) system and the system has been in operation for not less than five years or has been imposed pursuant to the terms of Section 45119 or 45120, the governing board of the community college district shall conduct an election by secret ballot of its classified personnel to determine whether or not they desire to have the merit system terminated within the community college district. The ballot shall read: “Shall the merit (civil service) system for classified employees be terminated in the ____ (name of community college district) as of ____ (termination date)?”

(B) As used in this subdivision, “classified employees” means all personnel who are a
 part of the classified service who are appointed in accordance with Section 88091.

(C) In order to be valid, the petition calling for the termination of the merit (civil service) system shall be submitted to the governing board of a community college district within 90 days after the date that the notice for the circulation of the petition was filed with the governing board of the community college district. The election shall be held during the regular academic year and shall be held no earlier than 45 days and no later than 180 days after the date that the petition was submitted to the governing board of the community college district.

(D) If the merit system was adopted pursuant to Section 88057, classified employees entitled to vote in an election pursuant to this paragraph shall be limited to those classified employees who reside in the district.

(E) The governing board of a community college district shall devise an identification system designed to protect against fraud in the balloting process while also ensuring the secrecy of the ballot. In addition, the governing board of the community college district shall appoint a three-member tabulation committee consisting of one member of the governing board, one member of the personnel commission of the community college district, and one member who shall be a classified employee of the community college district designated by the largest exclusive representative of classified employees within the community college district. It shall be the responsibility of the tabulation committee to canvass the election ballots and to certify the results of the election to the governing board of the community college district at the next regular meeting of the governing board of the community college district following the completion of the tabulation of
 the election results by the committee. No representative of the community college district shall make any marks upon the ballot envelope or ballot of any employee, except that the tabulation committee may adopt a system of uniformly stamping in a consistent manner and in the same location on all ballots received or all ballots counted, or both of those, to help ensure an accurate count.

(F) Notwithstanding any other law, the governing board of a community college district shall not be required to provide release time for classified personnel to vote in an election conducted pursuant to this paragraph. The governing board of the community college district shall not conduct an election under this paragraph more than once in any two-year period.

(G) Members of the classified service shall be provided an adequate and ample opportunity to be informed of the arguments in favor of and in
 opposition to the termination of the merit (classified service) system before the conducting of an election called pursuant to this paragraph. That opportunity shall include an open forum during which proponents of, and opponents to, the termination of the merit (civil service) system shall be permitted to debate the issue.

(b) If the community college district communicates with classified employees in favor of terminating the merit (civil service) system, it shall provide at least equal time and equal access to any exclusive representative of classified employees within the community college district to communicate against terminating that system. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as limiting the rights of an exclusive representative under the Educational Employment Relations Act (Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code) for access to communicate its position on terminating the
 system.

(c) (1) It shall be unlawful for a public school employer and the exclusive representative of the classified employees of a community college district to include the subject of the termination of the merit (classified service) system within the scope of representation.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) or any other law, all election procedures not specified above for an election pursuant to this section shall be within the scope of representation of an exclusive representative under Section 3543.2 of the Government Code, including the rules for campaigning, the election date, time, and place, translation of the ballot, electioneering near the polls, and balloting methods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 88, Sec. 4.   (AB 289)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

88139.

If the majority of the qualified electors vote to terminate the merit system in a community college district, or if the majority of the classified employees vote to terminate the merit system in a community college district, the personnel commission shall cease to function on the date specified in the election and the law pertaining to merit system districts shall cease to have any force or effect in that district.

Simultaneously, with the termination of the merit system, the governing board shall adopt rules and regulations relating to classified school employees as required by Section 88013.

Notwithstanding an action to terminate the merit system in a community college district, the provisions of Section 88051, 88053, and 88054 shall be applicable at any time after at least two years have elapsed after the system has ceased to operate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 188, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Salaries [88160. - 88168.]

88160.

The governing board of any community college district, including city boards of education, shall fix and order paid the compensation of persons a part of the classified service and other nonacademic employees employed by the board unless otherwise prescribed by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 195.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

88162.

(a) The governing board of any community college district shall, not later than the date prescribed by law for approval of the publication budget of every year, fix the annual salaries for the ensuing school year for all persons employed by the district in nonacademic positions. The governing board may, at the time, include an increase in those annual salaries, all or part of which increase is conditional upon the actual receipt by the district of anticipated revenue from all sources. If the revenue actually received is less than that anticipated, the governing board may, at any time during the school year, reduce those annual salaries by an amount not to exceed the amount which was granted subject to the receipt of such revenues.

(b) The governing board of a community college district may, at any time during the school year, increase the salaries of persons employed by the district in nonacademic positions. The increase shall be effective on any date ordered by the governing board.

(c) A governing board may, at any time, increase the wages or salaries of classified employees if the board or, in a merit system district, the personnel commission approves a classification change in a position, a class of positions, or any or all of the positions or classes of positions a part of the classified service.

(d) The provisions of this section shall not be construed to permit a governing board to demote or dismiss an employee as a result of reclassification of a position or class of positions except as may otherwise be permitted by law.

(e) This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 196.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

88163.

If the governing board of a community college district cannot comply with the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 88162 because it is engaged in a study, which was commenced prior to the commencement of the school year, to increase the salaries and wages of persons employed by the district in nonacademic positions, the board may, by appropriate action taken prior to the final adoption of its budget, do either of the following:

(a) Adopt an interim salary schedule which shall be the same schedule as for the preceding year, except that increases may be granted at that time based upon increased cost-of-living indexes, and provide that the salaries and wages fixed as a result of the study shall be payable for the entire school year to include the period thereof in which the study was conducted and final board action taken.

(b) Provide that the salaries and wages fixed as a result of the study shall be effective only for that portion of the school year, as determined by the board at the time it takes action after the study has been completed. “Portion of the school year,” as used in this subdivision shall not be for any period of time less than the period of time remaining in the school year from the date the governing board adopts the salary schedule based on the study commenced prior to that school year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 197.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

88164.

The governing board of any community college district not paying the annual or monthly salaries of persons employed by the district in 12 equal monthly payments may withhold, upon election by the individual employee, from each payment made to that employee an amount as follows:

(a) For an employee employed 11 months of a year, an amount equal to 813 percent thereof and the total amount deducted to be paid not later than the 10th day of September next succeeding.

(b) For an employee employed 10 months of a year, an amount equal to 1623 percent thereof and the total amount deducted to be paid in two equal monthly installments not later than the 10th day of August and the 10th day of September next succeeding.

(c) For an employee employed nine months a year, an amount equal to 25 percent thereof and the total amount deducted to be paid in three equal monthly installments not later than the 10th day of July, the 10th day of August and the 10th day of September next succeeding.

If Section 85244 is made applicable to any district, this section shall apply except that the amount deducted from each regular pay period and ultimate dates for payment of the amount deducted shall be computed and set in accordance with the system adopted under Section 85244.

Once an employee has elected to be brought under the provisions of this section, the election shall not be revocable until the commencement of the next ensuing fiscal year. However, if any employee leaves the service of the district by death or otherwise before receiving moneys that may be due him or her, the amount due the employee shall be paid within 30 days of the last working day to the employee or any other person entitled thereto by law.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 225.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88165.

Orders for the payment of wages and payroll orders and warrants for the payment of wages of employees a part of the classified service in any community college district shall be drawn at least once during each calendar month, for those districts not using Section 85244 or 85260. Payment shall be made on the last working day of the month in which the employee was in paid status.

This section shall not prohibit a community college district from making a payment of earned salary prior to the last working day of the pay period or of the month.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 226.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88166.

Whenever it is determined that an error has been made in the calculation or reporting in any classified employee payroll or in the payment of any classified employee’s salary, the appointing authority shall, within five workdays following such determination, provide the employee with a statement of the correction and a supplemental payment drawn against any available funds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88167.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the governing board of each community college district, when drawing an order for the salary or wage payment due to a classified employee of the community college district, may, without charge, reduce the order by the amount that it has been requested in a revocable written authorization by an employee who is a member of the bargaining unit to deduct for the payment of dues in, or for any other service provided by, any employee organization or bona fide association, whose membership consists, in whole or in part, of employees of that community college district, and that has, as one of its objectives, improvements in the terms or conditions of employment for the advancement of the welfare of those employees. Any revocation
 of a written authorization shall be in writing and shall be effective provided the revocation complies with the terms of the written authorization.

(2) The revocable written authorization shall remain in effect until expressly revoked in writing by the employee in accordance with the terms of the authorization. Whenever there is an increase in the amount required for the payment to the employee organization, the employee organization shall provide the employee with adequate and necessary data on the increase at a time sufficiently before the effective date of the increase to allow the employee an opportunity to revoke the written authorization, if desired and if permitted by the authorization. The employee organization shall provide the community college district with notification of the increase at a time sufficiently before the effective date of the increase to allow the employer an opportunity to make the necessary changes and with a copy of
 the notification of the increase that has been sent to all concerned employees.

(3) Upon receipt of a properly signed authorization for payroll deductions by a classified employee pursuant to this section, the governing board shall reduce the employee’s pay warrant by the designated amount in the next pay period following the closing date for receipt of changes in pay warrants.

(4) The governing board, on the same designated date of each month, shall draw its order upon the funds of the community college district in favor of the employee organization designated by the employee for an amount equal to the total of the respective deductions made with respect to the employee organization during the pay period.

(5) The governing board shall not require the completion of a new deduction authorization when a dues increase
 has been effected or at any other time without the express approval of the concerned employee organization.

(6) The governing board shall honor the terms of the employee’s written authorization for payroll deductions. Employee requests to cancel or change authorizations for payroll deductions for employee organizations shall be directed to the employee organization rather than to the governing board. The employee organization shall be responsible for processing such requests. The governing board shall rely on the information provided by the employee organization to cancel or change authorizations, and the employee organization shall indemnify the governing board for any claims made by the employee for deductions made in reliance on that information.

(7) A classified or recognized employee organization that certifies that it has and will maintain individual employee authorizations
 shall not be required to submit to the governing board a copy of the employee’s written authorization in order for the payroll deductions described in this section to be effective, unless a dispute arises about the existence or terms of the written authorization. The employee organization shall indemnify the governing board for any claims made by the employee for deductions made in reliance on its notification.

(b) The governing board of each community college district, when drawing an order for the salary or wage payment due to a classified employee of the community college district may, without charge, reduce the order for the payment of dues to, or for any other service provided by, the certified or recognized organization of which the classified employee is a member, or for the payment of service fees to the certified or recognized employee organization as required in an organizational security arrangement between the exclusive
 representative and a community college district employer as provided under Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code. However, the organizational security arrangement shall provide that any employee may pay service fees directly to the certified or recognized employee organization in lieu of having the service fees deducted from the salary or wage order.

(c) This section shall apply to community college districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 53, Sec. 4.   (SB 866)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

88167.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governing board of a community college district that collects or deducts dues, agency fees, fair share fees, or any other fee or amount of money from the salary of a classified employee for the purpose of transmitting the money to an employee organization shall transmit the money to the employee organization within 15 days of issuing the paycheck containing the deduction to the employee.

(b) (1) This section does not limit the right of an employee organization or affected employee to sue for a failure of the employer to transmit dues or fees pursuant to this section.

(2) In an action brought for a violation of subdivision (a), the court may award reasonable attorney’s fees and costs to the prevailing party if any party to the action requests attorney’s fees and costs.

(c) This section applies to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 139.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

88168.

Upon initial employment and upon each change in classification thereafter, each classified employee shall be furnished two copies of his or her class specification, salary data, assignment or work location, together with duty hours and the prescribed workweek. The salary data shall include the annual, monthly or pay period, daily, hourly, overtime and differential rate of compensation, whichever are applicable. One copy shall be retained by the employee and the other copy shall be signed and dated by the employee and returned to his or her supervisor.

This section shall not apply to short-term, limited-term, or provisional employees, as those terms are defined in this chapter.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 228.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Differential Compensation [88180. - 88186.]

88180.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply unless the context indicates otherwise:

(a) “Differential compensation” means either a reduction in the number of hours required to be actually worked or an increase in salary.

(b) “Shift” means the number of hours worked and shall include a duty-free meal period of not less than one-half hour which, in the case of a seven- or eight-hour shift, shall occur approximately at the midpoint of the shift. This subdivision shall not apply to employees working six hours or less, or assigned to a split shift.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88181.

The governing board of every community college district, or the personnel commission in any merit system district, shall, insofar as it is possible to do so, determine the practices relating to morning- and night-shift salary differentials in the private employment fields in which it must compete for employees for its classified staff and shall consider the advisability of providing comparable salary differentials for its classified staff.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88182.

The governing board of any community college district may provide differential compensation to those classified employees who perform duties of a distasteful, dangerous, or unique nature when, in the opinion of the board, such compensation is reasonably justified.

In a merit system district, such differentials shall be based upon findings and recommendations of the personnel commission and shall not be applied in a manner contrary to the principle of like pay for like service.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88183.

Assignment to duties for which differential compensation is designated, other than a temporary assignment of less than 20 working days, shall be made on the basis of seniority among those employees within the appropriate class who request such an assignment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88184.

No employee assigned to work a shift entitled to differential compensation shall be demoted in class or grade as a result of such an assignment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88185.

An employee receiving differential compensation on the basis of his or her shift shall not lose that compensation if the employee is temporarily, for 20 working days or less, assigned to a shift not entitled to that compensation. The regular rate of pay for all purposes of an employee assigned to a shift which provides differential compensation shall be the differential rate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 229.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88186.

This article shall apply to community college districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Resignations and Leaves of Absence [88190. - 88210.]

88190.

(a) Governing boards of community college districts may grant voluntary leaves of absence and vacations, with or without pay, to persons employed in the classified service of the district.

(b) If a community college district places an employee on an involuntary leave of absence during the period the employee is charged with a criminal offense, is under a criminal investigation, or is waiting due to administrative delay for necessary job-related administrative determinations, then upon the conclusion of the proceedings in favor of the employee, the community college district shall pay to the employee the employee’s full compensation for the period of the involuntary leave of absence upon the employee’s return to service in the
 community college district. For purposes of this subdivision, “involuntary leave of absence” includes, but is not limited to, a compulsory leave of absence or a suspension. This subdivision shall not reduce any entitlement to paid leave or replace any relevant procedures under any other law.

(c) This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 331, Sec. 2.   (AB 472)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

88191.

Every classified employee employed five days a week by a community college district shall be entitled to 12 days leave of absence for illness or injury and such additional days, in addition thereto, as the governing board may allow for illness or injury, exclusive of all days the employee is not required to render service to the district, with full pay for a fiscal year of service.

A classified employee, employed five days a week, who is employed for less than a full fiscal year, is entitled to that proportion of 12 days leave of absence for illness or injury as the number of months the employee is employed bears to 12 and the proportionate amount, consistent with this formula, of such additional days, in addition thereto, authorized by the governing board for classified employees employed five days a week for a full fiscal year of service.

A classified employee employed less than five days per week shall be entitled, for a fiscal year of service, to that proportion of 12 days leave of absence for illness or injury as the number of days the employee is employed per week bears to five and is entitled to the proportionate amount, consistent with this formula, of such additional days, in addition thereto, authorized by the governing board for classified employees employed five days a week for a full fiscal year of service.

When these persons are employed for less than a full fiscal year of service, this and the preceding paragraph shall determine that proportion of leave of absence for illness or injury to which they are entitled.

Pay for any day of such absence shall be the same as the pay which would have been received had the employee served during the day. Credit for leave of absence need not be accrued prior to taking that leave by the employee and such leave of absence may be taken at any time during the year. However, a new employee of a district shall not be eligible to take more than six days, or the proportionate amount to which the employee may be entitled under this section, until the first day of the calendar month after completion of six months of active service with the district.

If the employee does not take the full amount of leave allowed in any year under this section, the amount not taken shall be accumulated from year to year with such additional days as the governing board may allow.

The governing board of each community college district shall adopt rules and regulations requiring and prescribing the manner of proof of illness or injury for the purpose of this section. These rules and regulations shall not discriminate against evidence of treatment and the need therefor by the practice of the religion of any well-recognized religious sect, denomination or organization.

This section shall not apply to a district in which the full-time equivalent student of the district is in excess of 400,000, if the district maintains sick leave policies not less than those in effect in such districts on January 1, 1961.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 230.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88192.

(a) The governing board of a community college district shall provide, by rules and regulations, for industrial accident or illness leaves of absence for employees who are a part of the classified service. The governing board of a community college district that is created or whose boundaries or status is changed by an action to organize or reorganize community college districts completed after January 1, 1975, shall provide, by rules and regulations, for these leaves of absence on or before the date on which the organization or reorganization of the community college district becomes effective for all purposes.

(b) The rules and regulations shall include all of the following provisions:

(1) Allowable
 leave shall not be for less than 60 working days in any one fiscal year for the same accident.

(2) Allowable leave shall not be accumulative from year to year.

(3) Industrial accident or illness leave of absence shall commence on the first day of absence.

(4) Payment for wages lost on any day shall not, when added to an award granted the employee under the workers’ compensation laws of this state, exceed the normal wage for the day.

(5) Industrial accident leave shall be reduced by one day for each day of authorized absence regardless of a compensation award made under workers’ compensation.

(6) When an industrial accident or illness occurs at a time when the full 60 days will overlap into
 the next fiscal year, the employee shall be entitled to only that amount remaining at the end of the fiscal year in which the injury or illness occurred, for the same illness or injury.

(c) The industrial accident or illness leave of absence is to be used in lieu of entitlement acquired under Section 88191. When entitlement to industrial accident or illness leave has been exhausted, entitlement to other sick leave will then be used, but if an employee is receiving workers’ compensation, the employee shall be entitled to use only so much of his or her accumulated or available sick leave, accumulated compensating time, vacation or other available leave as, when added to the workers’ compensation award, provide for a full day’s wage or salary.

(d) The governing board of a community college district, by rule or regulation, may provide for additional leave of absence, paid or unpaid,
 as it deems appropriate and during that leave the employee may return to his or her position without suffering any loss of status or benefits.

(e) A period of leave of absence, paid or unpaid, shall not be considered to be a break in service of the employee.

(f) During a paid leave of absence, whether industrial accident leave as provided in this section, sick leave, vacation, compensated time off or other available leave provided by law or the action of a governing board of a community college district, the employee shall endorse to the community college district wage loss benefit checks received under the workers’ compensation laws of this state. The community college district, in turn, shall issue the employee appropriate warrants for payment of wages or salary and shall deduct normal retirement and other authorized contributions. Reduction of entitlement to leave shall be made
 only in accordance with this section.

(g) When all available leaves of absence, paid or unpaid, have been exhausted and if the employee is not medically able to assume the duties of his or her position, the employee, if not placed in another position, shall be placed on a reemployment list for a period of 39 months. When available, during the 39-month period, the employee shall be employed in a vacant position in the class of his or her previous assignment over all other available candidates except for a reemployment list established because of lack of work or lack of funds, in which case the employee shall be listed in accordance with appropriate seniority regulations.

(h) The governing board of a community college district may require that an employee serve, or have served continuously, a specified period of time with the community college district before the benefits provided
 by this section are made available to the employee. However, that period shall not exceed three years. All service of an employee before the effective date of this section shall be credited in determining compliance with the requirement.

(i) In the absence of rules and regulations adopted by the governing board of a community college district pursuant to this section, an employee shall be entitled to industrial and accident or illness leave as provided in this section but without limitation as to the number of days of that leave and without any requirement of a specified period of service.

(j) An employee who has been placed on a reemployment list, as provided in this section, who has been medically released for return to duty and who fails to accept an appropriate assignment shall be dismissed.

(k) This section
 applies to community college districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 75.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

88193.

The governing board of any community college district may provide for such leave of absence from duty as it deems appropriate for any female employee in the classified service of the district who is required to absent herself from her duties because of pregnancy or convalescence following childbirth, and may adopt rules and regulations prescribing the manner of proof of pregnancy, the time during pregnancy at which the leave of absence shall be taken, and the length of time for which the leave of absence shall continue after birth of the child. The board may also provide in the rules and regulations whether leave granted under this section shall be with or without pay and, if with pay, the amount, if any, to be deducted from the salary due the employee for the period in which the absence occurs. However, nothing in this section shall be construed
 so as to deprive any employee of sick leave rights under other sections of this code for absences due to illness or injury resulting from pregnancy.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 3 (commencing with Section 88060) of this chapter.

This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 26.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 27 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

88193.

(a) (1) The governing board of a community college district shall provide for a leave of absence from duty for an employee in the classified service of the community college district who is required to be absent from duty because the employee is experiencing or has experienced pregnancy, miscarriage, childbirth, termination of pregnancy, or recovery from those conditions. The length of the leave of absence, including the date on which the leave shall commence and the date on which the employee shall resume duties, shall be determined by the employee and the employee’s physician. Except as provided in paragraph (2), the leave of absence shall be with full pay, subject to a maximum of 14 weeks. The paid leave may begin before and continue after childbirth if the employee is actually
 disabled by pregnancy, childbirth, termination of pregnancy, or related medical conditions.

(2) For part-time employees in the classified service, the amount of paid leave per week, subject to a maximum of 14 weeks, shall be calculated in accordance with the following:

(A) If the part-time employee works a fixed number of hours per week, the employee shall receive weekly pay for the total number of hours the employee is normally scheduled to work for the community college district.

(B) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii), if the part-time employee does not work a fixed number of hours per week, the employee shall receive weekly pay in an amount equaling the employee’s average weekly pay during the six-month period immediately preceding the date that the employee began their paid leave.

(ii) If the part-time employee has been employed for less than six months, the employee shall receive weekly pay in an amount equaling the employee’s average weekly pay during the entire period of that employment preceding the date that the employee began their paid leave.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, a community college district shall maintain group health coverage for an employee who takes a leave of absence under this section for the duration of the leave of absence at the same level and under the same conditions that coverage would have been provided if the employee had not taken a leave of absence.

(4) A leave of absence taken under this section shall not be deducted from any other leaves of absence available to the employee for subsequent injury, illness, or disabilities, including those caused or
 contributed to by pregnancy, miscarriage, or childbirth, pursuant to state or federal regulations or laws, except as provided in subdivision (e).

(5) Compensation during the leave of absence taken under this section shall include retirement fund contributions required of the community college district. The employee shall earn full service credit during the leave of absence and shall pay member contributions to the retirement fund.
